Hawaii statutes.
§605-17 Penalties. Any person
violating sections 605-14 to 605-16 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1955,
c 150, §2; RL 1955, §217-15; HRS §605-17; am L 1972, c 184, §1(i); am L 1975, c
45, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 47, §2]

Case Notes

Penalty for first offense is only a violation. 68 H. 226,
708 P.2d 138 (1985).

Where Oregon law firm did not "practice law within the
jurisdiction" of Hawaii, it did not violate §605-14 nor this section;
thus, plaintiff could recover fees under §607-14 for services rendered by
firm. 87 H. 37, 951 P.2d 487 (1998).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next